Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 8 Accounting for Public Funds

Cross references.

Submission by judges of probate court, county treasurers, or others of returns stating amount of money belonging to county, and as to grand jury examination of such returns, §

36-1-7

.

Disaster Volunteer Leave Act, §

38-3-90

et seq.

45-8-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Collecting officer” means any person who is either generally or specifically elected, appointed, or employed, in whole or in part, to collect any tax, revenue, or other moneys on behalf of the state or any of its political subdivisions or on behalf of any board, commission, bureau, or department thereof. The term shall not mean any state, municipality, or county tax collector or revenue agent pursuant to Title 48.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of banking and finance.

“County authority” means the judge of the probate court or the board of county commissioners or other tribunal, body, or officer having jurisdiction over the fiscal affairs of the county.

“Covered depository” means:

Any depository whose total assets exceed $50 billion as of the latest Consolidated Report of Condition and Income filed by the depository with the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and has qualified to serve as a depository for state funds pursuant to Code Section 50-17-50; or

A depository whose total assets are less than $50 billion as of the latest Consolidated Report of Condition and Income filed by the depository with the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, has qualified to serve as a depository for state funds pursuant to Code Section 50-17-50, and has elected to participate in the multibank pooled method.

A covered depository in operation as of January 1, 2016, may continue to secure public body deposits using the dedicated method, the single bank method, or both methods until policies and procedures have been approved by the State Depository Board regarding the multibank pooled method, which shall occur no later than July 1, 2017.

“Custodian” means the state treasurer, any Federal Reserve Bank, or any Federal Home Loan Bank approved by the state treasurer, or any bank, savings association, or trust company that:

Is organized and existing under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States;

Has executed all forms required under this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter;

Agrees to be subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state or of courts of the United States which are located within this state for the purpose of any litigation arising out of this chapter; and

Has been approved by the state treasurer to act as a custodian;

and which holds a pool of collateral for public deposits established by a depository pursuant to Code Section 45-8-13.

“Daily pool balance” means the daily balance of deposits of public funds held by a depository which balance is secured by the single bank pooled method as specified in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 45-8-13, or the multibank pooled method as specified in paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 45-8-13. Insured deposits and deposits of public funds for which no collateral is required under subsection (b) or (d) of Code Section 45-8-12 or special deposits and operating funds for which collateral has been duly waived pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 45-8-11 or paragraph (3) of Code Section 50-17-53 shall be excluded from the balance of deposits of public funds for purposes of determining the daily pool balance.

“Default” includes, without limitation, the failure or refusal of a depository holding funds of a public body to pay any check or warrant drawn upon sufficient and collected funds by any public body depositor or to return any deposit on demand or at maturity together with interest as agreed; the issuance of an order by any supervisory authority restraining such depository from making payments of deposit liabilities; or the appointment of a receiver for such depository.

“Depository” means any bank designated, named, or appointed from time to time:

By the State Depository Board as qualified to serve as a depository of state funds pursuant to Code Section 50-17-50;

By county authorities or others as depositories for county and other public funds pursuant to Code Section 45-8-14; or

By collecting officers and officers holding public funds as a depository for public funds pursuant to Code Section 45-8-11.

“Officer to hold public funds” means not only the state treasurer, municipality or county treasurers, the State School Superintendent, municipality or county school superintendents, and treasurers of school districts, but also every other person, by whatever name or title called, who shall be either generally or specially elected, appointed, or employed with the duty, in whole or in part, to receive, hold, or disburse any public money or revenue on behalf of the state or any of its political subdivisions or on behalf of any board, commission, bureau, or department.

“Proper authority” means the officer, board, commission, or other tribunal or body having the jurisdiction to act in the particular matter.

“Public body” means not only the state, municipalities, counties, school districts, drainage districts, and other districts created for special purposes, but also every other political subdivision of the state and every board, bureau, commission, and department of the state or any subdivision thereof, as the context may require.

“State authority” means the officer or officers or board, bureau, commission, or other person or persons who, in their official capacity, shall have, according to the laws of this state, the duty or jurisdiction to act on behalf of the state in the particular matter.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 2; Code 1933, § 89-801; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 1997, p. 868, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, §§ 3, 4/SB 296; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 45/HB 142; Ga. L. 2016, p. 249, § 1/SB 283.

The 2016 amendment,

effective April 26, 2016, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and for all other purposes effective July 1, 2016, rewrote this Code section.

45-8-2.
Bonds — Requirement of officers holding state funds; requirement of additional bond or security; declaring office vacant upon failure to give additional security; reduction of bonds; substitution of new bonds.

The state authorities shall require all collecting officers and all officers to hold public funds, so far as relates to moneys or revenues of the state, to give bond, on or before entering on the duties of their office, appointment, or employment, with good security for the faithful performance of the duties of their office and faithfully to account for all moneys coming into their hands, together with such other conditions as the laws may require as to the official bond of the particular officer in question.

If the state authority having supervision or control over the officer or the conduct of his office shall deem at any time that the bond given by such officer is insufficient in amount or is inadequate as to security, he shall notify such officer to give an additional bond or to increase the security. If within the time required by such state authority the officer fails to give the additional bond or to make adequate the security, the state authority shall, if the same be an office the incumbent of which such state authority has the jurisdiction or power to remove, declare the office vacant. If it is an office the incumbent of which such state authority does not have the power to remove, the state authority shall report the same to the Governor; and thereupon, if it be an office the incumbent of which the Governor has power to remove for cause, the Governor, after giving such officer opportunity to be heard, shall have the power to declare the office vacant. If it relates to an officer who can be removed only by impeachment proceedings, the Governor shall report the same to the General Assembly. The Governor shall have concurrent jurisdiction with all other proper authorities to require any collecting officer or any officer to hold public funds to give additional bond or security.

The Governor or other proper state authority shall have the jurisdiction and authority to allow any collecting officer or any officer to hold public funds of the state to reduce his bond by an order discharging the existing bonds of such officer from future liability and the giving of a new bond by said officer in the reduced amount which shall not be below the amount required of such officer as a minimum by the laws of this state.

The Governor or other proper state authority shall have the jurisdiction and authority to allow any such officer to substitute a new bond for his existing bond or bonds and to discharge the existing bond or bonds as to future liability by an order to that effect.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 3; Code 1933, § 89-806.

Cross references.

Giving of bonds by public officers generally, T. 45, C. 4.

45-8-3.
Bonds — Requirement of officers holding other than state funds; increase, reduction, or discharge of bonds.

All municipality or county authorities and all other proper authorities shall, as to collecting officers and officers to hold public funds other than those dealt with in Code Section 45-8-2, have the jurisdiction and authority to require bonds of such officers, of the same kind as is prescribed in Code Section 45-8-2, and shall have the same power and authority to require such officers to increase their bonds or the security thereon, to permit the reduction of such bonds, and to give discharge to existing bonds as to future liability upon new bonds being given, all in like manner as is set forth in Code Section 45-8-2.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 3a; Code 1933, § 89-807.

45-8-4.
Bonds — Declaring office vacant upon officer’s failure to give additional security.

If any such officer is required to give additional bond or security pursuant to Code Section 45-8-3 and fails to do so within the time required, the proper authority shall:

Declare the office vacant, if such proper authority has the power of removal over such office; or

If such proper authority does not have the power of removal, it shall report the same to the Governor or officer having power of removal, who, after giving the delinquent officer opportunity to be heard, shall have the power to declare the office vacant.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 4; Code 1933, § 89-808.

45-8-5.
Bonds — Fixing of amount and approval.

The amount of the bonds of collecting officers and officers to hold public funds shall be in the amount fixed by the proper authority, unless the amount is fixed by existing general laws, and shall be approved by the proper authority and filed as required by law. Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the proper authority to fix the amount of bonds and to approve the same is the officer or officers upon whom those duties are imposed by existing laws. Where the law does not designate what officer shall perform these duties, the proper authority shall be the officer, board, bureau, or commission having supervision over the particular office or officer. Municipality or county authorities shall be deemed the proper authorities as to fixing the amount and approving bonds of municipality or county treasurers and those acting as substitutes for municipality or county treasurers under local laws and as to all other collecting officers and officers holding public funds, so far as relates to municipality or county taxes or revenue, and shall be deemed the proper authority as to requiring additional bonds or strengthening security on bonds, as to allowing reduction or substitution of bonds, and as to discharging bonds from future liability, so far as relates to such officers.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 5; Code 1933, § 89-809.

45-8-6.
Bonds — Liability of new or additional bond for defaults occurring prior to and subsequent to effective date.

Where any collecting officer, officer to hold public funds, bank, or depository gives an additional bond or adds new security during his term, the bond in force at the time and securities thereon shall be liable for defaults occurring prior to the time the additional bond or security is given; and the existing bond or security and the additional bond or security shall be jointly, severally, and concurrently liable for subsequent defaults. If the order requiring a new bond so provides, the sureties on the old bond or bonds shall be discharged from future liability and the new bond alone shall be liable therefor. However, if the new bond so provides, it may assume concurrent liability with the old bond as to defaults occurring prior to the date of its being given, or, if the officer having the duty of approving the bond so consents, the new bond may assume sole liability from a date prior to the time of its being filed and the old bond or bonds may be discharged from liability from the date as of which such new bond is operative.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 14; Code 1933, § 89-835.

45-8-7.
Bonds — Interest against principal and surety upon breach of bond; additional penalty for bad faith; attorneys’ fees.

Upon breaches of the bond of any officer, bank, or depository, interest shall run against the principal on the bond at the rate of 7 percent per annum from the date of the breach and against the surety at the same rate from the date of the demand on the surety. If the breach shall involve dishonesty on the part of the officer or bank, the official or county authority having jurisdiction to cite the officer, or any court acquiring jurisdiction over the subject matter, may, as against the offending principal in the bond, impose an additional penalty of not more than 10 percent of the amount of the loss and a reasonable sum for attorneys’ fees. This penalty and award of attorneys’ fees may also be imposed upon the surety by any court acquiring jurisdiction of the subject matter, in the event it is shown that the surety has acted in bad faith and has been vexatiously litigious or that it has filed defensive proceedings for delay only. Existing laws imposing higher rates of interest or penalties upon principals or sureties upon any of such bonds are superseded by this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 12; Code 1933, § 89-833.

45-8-8.
Bonds — When principal and surety not liable.

Neither the principal nor the surety on any bond of any collecting officer or any officer to hold public funds shall be liable for the failure of such officer to account for any public money coming into his hands which he shall have deposited in any designated depository or, if the proper authority shall have failed to designate a depository, in any bank selected by him, if it was deposited in the name of the public body to which it belongs, in his own name in his official title or with his official capacity disclosed, or if the bank receiving the same shall otherwise have notice of the public nature of the deposit, provided that said failure to account is attributable solely to the failure or insolvency of such depository.

Neither the principal nor the surety on the bond of the head of any state department or agency shall be liable for the failure of an employee of any such department or agency to account for any public money coming into the hands of such employee, if such employee is bonded in an amount deemed adequate by the head of the department or agency and the state auditor and the bond complies with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 13; Ga. L. 1964, p. 282, § 1.

45-8-9.
Bonds — Limitation of actions on bonds.

No action on the bond of any collecting officer, officer to hold public funds, bank, or depository shall be maintained unless the action or proceeding is begun within six years from the date the alleged cause of action accrued; nor shall any action be maintained against any surety because of an alleged breach of the bond, unless, within three years from the date the alleged cause of action accrues, an action is begun against the surety or a citation is issued against the surety by the official, municipality, or county authority having jurisdiction to cite or an execution is issued against the surety as provided for in Code Section 45-8-25.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 11; Code 1933, § 89-832.

45-8-10.
Deposit of funds in banks or depositories — Requirement generally.

All funds belonging to the state or to any of its bureaus, commissions, boards, or departments shall be deposited in designated state depositories. Every collecting officer and every officer to hold public funds who receives any money belonging to any public body shall promptly deposit the money in a designated state depository.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 6; Code 1933, § 89-810.

Cross references.

State depositories, §

50-17-50

et seq.

45-8-11.
Deposit of funds in banks or depositories — Authority of officers holding public funds to determine amounts to be deposited; waiver of requirement for depository to give security.

Every collecting officer and officer holding public funds shall be authorized to determine, from time to time, in respect to all public funds held by such officer, any and all of the following:

The maximum amount of public money which may be deposited in a particular depository;

The maximum and minimum proportion of public funds which may be maintained in a particular depository; and

The amount of public funds to be deposited in particular depositories as time deposits and the periods of such deposits.

All depositories shall give security for deposits of public funds. However, a collecting officer or officer holding public funds may, in his discretion, waive the requirement for security in the case of operating funds placed in demand deposit checking accounts.

This Code section shall not apply to collecting officers and officers holding public funds pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 17 of Title 50, relating to state depositories.

History.

Code 1933, § 89-810.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 969, § 1.

45-8-12.
Deposit of funds in banks or depositories — Depository to give bond; pledge of securities in lieu of bond; acceptance of federal insurance as security; combination of securities; aggregate amount of bond.

The collecting officer or officer holding public funds may not have on deposit at any one time in any depository for a time longer than ten days a sum of money belonging to the public body when such depository has not given a bond to the public body as set forth in this Code section. The bond to be given by depositories, where such bonds are required, shall be a surety bond signed by a surety company duly qualified and authorized to transact business within this state in a sum as so required. In lieu of such a surety bond, the depository may pledge to the public body as security any one or more of the obligations enumerated in Code Section 50-17-59, relating to the bond required to secure state deposits and securities in lieu of bond.

The collecting officer or officer holding public funds shall accept the guarantee or insurance of accounts by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation to secure public funds on deposit in depositories to the extent authorized by federal law governing the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

A depository may secure deposits made with it partly by surety bond, partly by deposit of any one or more of the obligations referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section, partly by the guarantee or insurance of accounts by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or by any combination of these methods. Except for covered depositories, the aggregate of the face value of such surety bond and the market value of securities pledged shall be equal to not less than 110 percent of the public funds being secured after the deduction of the amount of deposit insurance.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code section, a depository may deduct the face amount of direct loans from deposits of a public body before being required to secure such deposits by a surety bond, deposit insurance, securities, or any combination thereof.

This Code section shall not apply to collecting officers and officers holding public funds pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 17 of Title 50, relating to state depositories.

History.

Code 1933, § 89-810.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 969, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 905, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1334, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 249, § 2/SB 283.

The 2016 amendment,

effective April 26, 2016, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and for all other purposes effective July 1, 2016, in subsection (b), substituted “by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation” for “of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and the guarantee or insurance of accounts of the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation” in the middle and deleted “and the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation” following “Corporation” at the end; and, in subsection (c), substituted “of accounts by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation” for “referred to in subsection (b) of this Code section” in the first sentence and substituted “Except for covered depositories, the” for “The” at the beginning of the second sentence.

45-8-13.
Deposit of funds in banks or depositories — Deposit of securities by banks or depositories; contract as to interest or compensation.

Any depository in this state is authorized to give such bond or to secure deposits of public funds by deposits of securities, whether the securities are owned by the depository into which the public funds are deposited or are owned by another bank, and the proper authorities are authorized to make contracts with depositories as to interest or compensation of the depository.

Depositories that are not covered depositories may secure deposits of public funds using the dedicated method, the single bank pooled method, or both methods, as enumerated in this subsection:

Under the dedicated method, a depository shall secure the deposits of each of its public body depositors separately. It is intended that the dedicated method is the method permitted under Code Section 45-8-12 and that this method will not be affected by this subsection; or

Under the single bank pooled method, a depository shall secure deposits of public funds of public bodies which have deposits with it through a pool of collateral established by the depository with a custodian for the benefit of public bodies having deposits with such depository as set forth in Code Section 45-8-13.1. If a depository elects the single bank pooled method, it may use the single bank pooled method with some public body depositors and the dedicated method with other public body depositors.

Covered depositories shall secure public funds from public bodies as provided in this subsection:

Establish a pool of collateral with a custodian for the benefit of public bodies having deposits with such covered depository as set forth in Code Section 45-8-13.1;

Secure deposits made with it partly by surety bond, partly by deposit of any one or more of the obligations referred to in subsection (a) of Code Section 45-8-12, partly by the guarantee or insurance of accounts by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, any obligation authorized pursuant to the policies and procedures of the State Depository Board, or by any combination of these methods. The aggregate of the face value of such surety bond and the market value of securities pledged shall be a percent of the public funds being secured after the deduction of the amount of deposit insurance as established quarterly pursuant to a formula proposed by the commissioner and adopted by the State Depository Board based on the ratings of the covered depository from one or more nationally recognized rating services. The commissioner is authorized to propose to the State Depository Board multiple tiers of collateralization requiring different percentages of securities to be pledged to secure deposited public funds; and

Under the multibank pooled method, each covered depository shall guarantee the deposits of a public body against loss caused by the default of other depositories within the multibank pool.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 6; Code 1933, § 89-812; Ga. L. 1993, p. 929, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 45; Ga. L. 1997, p. 868, § 2; Ga. L. 2016, p. 249, § 3/SB 283.

The 2016 amendment,

effective April 26, 2016, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and for all other purposes effective July 1, 2016,
in subsection (b), inserted “that are not covered depositories” near the beginning, and substituted “, the single bank pooled method, or both methods,” for “or the pooled method” near the end; in paragraph (b)(1), inserted “body” near the end of the first sentence; in paragraph (b)(2), inserted “single bank” three times and inserted “body” twice; and rewrote subsection (c).

45-8-13.1.
Depositories using pooled method of securing deposits of public funds; qualifications; rights and responsibilities of state treasurer; establishing policies and procedures.

Only depositories which have met the qualifications imposed by this Code section may use a pooled method. If a depository elects a pooled method, it shall notify the state treasurer in writing of its desire to utilize a pooled method and the proposed effective date thereof and provide to the state treasurer executed copies of the custodial agreement, resolution, and other agreements and data as may be required by the state treasurer. Upon meeting the qualifications of this Code section, the state treasurer shall issue a certificate of qualification, and such bank or trust company shall become a depository permitted to use a pooled method.

The aggregate of the market value of the securities pledged to secure a pool of public funds under the single bank pooled method shall be not less than 110 percent of the daily pool balance. The aggregate of the market value of the securities pledged to secure a pool of public funds under the multibank pooled method shall be not less than the percent established by the State Depository Board for the multibank pooled method provided for in paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 45-8-13, which shall be neither less than 25 percent nor greater than 125 percent. Notwithstanding these parameters for the multibank pool, the aggregate market value of securities pledged shall be not less than 100 percent for amounts greater than 20 percent of the total daily pool balance held by any one covered depository. The State Depository Board, upon the recommendation of the state treasurer, in consultation with the commissioner, shall have the authority to increase the percent collateralization of any covered depository to a maximum of 125 percent at any time as economic conditions warrant.

A depository may not retain any deposit of public funds which is required to be secured unless, within ten days thereafter or such shorter period as has been agreed upon by the depository and the state treasurer, it has deposited for the benefit of the pool eligible collateral equal to its required collateral pursuant to this Code section.

For reporting purposes, each depository using a pooled method shall determine the market value of its collateral. Each depository shall provide such monthly reports to the state treasurer as the state treasurer shall require.

A depository may not substitute or withdraw collateral previously pledged as part of a pool without the prior approval of the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall grant such approval if:

In the case of substitution of collateral, the market value of the substituted collateral is equal to or greater than the market value of the collateral withdrawn; and

In the case of withdrawal of collateral:

The depository certifies in writing that such withdrawal will not reduce its collateral below its required collateral; and

This certification is substantiated by a statement of the depository’s current daily pool balance that indicates that after withdrawal such deposits will continue to be secured to the full extent required by law.

The state treasurer shall be authorized to delegate to any bank, savings association, trust company, or other qualified firm, corporation, or association which is authorized to transact business in the State of Georgia such of its rights and responsibilities with respect to a pooled method as the state treasurer deems appropriate including, without limitation, the right to approve or disapprove any substitutions or withdrawals permitted under this Code section. Fees and expenses of the bank, savings association, trust company, or other qualified firm, corporation, or association to which the state treasurer delegates his or her rights and responsibilities under this subsection shall be paid by the depositories using a pooled method.

The state treasurer, upon a default by a depository using a pooled method, shall request immediate delivery of such part of the pooled, pledged collateral as may be needed to hold the state treasurer or any public body depositor harmless from losses incurred by the default. The state treasurer shall have full discretion as to the amounts and securities to be delivered. The state treasurer shall sell as much of the collateral as is needed to provide cash to cover the amount of the default and expenses resulting therefrom. From the proceeds of the sale of such collateral, the state treasurer shall pay any amounts owing to public body depositors who participated in the pooled fund of the defaulting depository. Public body depositors whose deposits are secured by a single bank pool of a defaulting depository shall look solely to the assets of such pool and to the assets of the defaulting depository and shall have no claim, ex contractu or otherwise, against the state, other depositories, or the assets of pools created by other depositories. Public body depositors whose deposits are secured in a multibank pool of a defaulting covered depository shall look to the assets of the defaulting covered depository. If such assets are insufficient to cover amounts owing to public body depositors, the state treasurer shall assess all covered depositories, except the defaulting covered depository, on a pro rata basis based upon a covered depository’s percentage remaining share of the deposit of the public body; and a public body depositor shall have no claim, ex contractu or otherwise, against the state, depositories outside the multibank pool, or the assets of pools in a defaulting depository created outside the multibank pool. The failure of a covered depository to satisfy an assessment from the state treasurer in a timely manner shall be an event of default.

In addition to all of the rights provided to the state treasurer in this chapter, the state treasurer shall have the following powers:

To adopt such rules and prescribe such forms as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter;

To decline, accept, or reduce the reported value of collateral, as circumstances may require, in order to ensure the pledging of sufficient marketable collateral to meet the purposes of this chapter;

To suspend or disqualify any custodian or depository that has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter;

To require depositories to furnish detailed monthly reports of deposits from public bodies held by the depository, including depositor names and addresses, deposit amounts, and any additional information requested by the state treasurer;

To confirm deposits of funds by a public body to the extent possible under current law; and

To monitor and confirm, as often as deemed necessary by the state treasurer, the pledged collateral held by third-party custodians.

Neither the provisions of this chapter nor the exercise of any right or duty by the state treasurer or the commissioner authorized or permitted by Code Section 45-8-13 or this Code section shall be construed as a waiver of sovereign immunity.

Pursuant to Code Section 50-17-53 and the other powers of the State Depository Board, the State Depository Board may establish policies and procedures related to the operation of a multibank pool, including, but not limited to, defining eligible collateral, establishing collateral limits, adopting the schedule of fees charged to covered depositories, establishing a formula to calculate different collateralization tiers, and reporting requirements.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-8-13.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 868, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 4/SB 296; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 45/HB 142; Ga. L. 2016, p. 249, § 4/SB 283.

The 2016 amendment,

effective April 26, 2016, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and for all other purposes effective July 1, 2016, substituted “a pooled” for “the pooled” throughout this Code section; in subsection (b), inserted “under the single bank pooled method” in the first sentence and added the last three sentences; in paragraph (c)(1), substituted “state treasurer” for “public depositors secured by the pool”; rewrote subsection (e); in paragraph (f)(4), substituted “deposits from public bodies held by the depository, including depositor names and addresses, deposit” for “public deposits held by depositors’ names, addresses,”; in paragraph (f)(5), substituted “funds by a public body” for “public funds”; inserted “or the commissioner” in subsection (g); and added subsection (h).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, “chapter” was substituted for “Act” in subsection (g).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, “this Code section” was substituted for “45-8-13.1” in subsection (g).

45-8-14.
Depositories for county and school district moneys.

The governing authority of each county shall designate one or more solvent banks, insured federal savings and loan associations, or insured state chartered building and loan associations as depositories of all county moneys. The board of education of each county school district and of each independent school district shall designate one or more solvent banks, insured federal savings and loan associations, or insured state chartered building and loan associations as depositories of all school district moneys.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 6; Code 1933, § 89-811; Ga. L. 1975, p. 696, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 412, § 1.

45-8-14.1.
Funds held by depository; policies and procedures; effective date.

For the purposes of this chapter, funds shall be considered to be held by a depository, regardless of whether or not such funds are subsequently distributed among one or more federally insured banks or savings and loan associations, provided that:

The funds are initially deposited in a depository whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

Such depository arranges for depositing the funds in one or more federally insured banks or savings and loan associations insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, wherever located;

The full amount of the principal and accrued interest of each financial deposit instrument is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation; and

Any third-party service provider facilitating the placement of deposits in accordance with this Code section is approved by the State Depository Board.

Pursuant to Code Section 50-17-53 and the other powers of the State Depository Board, the State Depository Board shall establish policies and procedures related to the approval of third-party service providers and the ongoing monitoring of participation in deposit placement programs in accordance with this Code section. The State Depository Board shall establish such policies and procedures no later than December 31, 2019.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-8-14.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 335, § 1/SB 157.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 2, 2019.

45-8-15.
Deposit of funds in banks or depositories — Lien in favor of public body on bank assets; deposit as trust fund.

Upon any deposit of public funds being made in any bank, whether designated as a depository or not, there shall arise in favor of the public body to which such fund belongs a lien on all the assets of said bank, superior to all other liens, for the amount of such funds. Upon being deposited in any bank, all funds of any public body shall be deemed to be held as a trust fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 6; Code 1933, § 89-813.

45-8-16.
Deposit of funds in banks or depositories — Deposits showing officer’s official title deemed public funds.

Money of any public body deposited in any bank by any collecting officer or officer to hold public funds, though deposited in his own name, shall, if the account stands in his name in his official capacity or is marked with words or abbreviations showing his official title or if the bank otherwise knows that it is public money, be deemed to be funds of a public body within the scope of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 6; Code 1933, § 89-814.

45-8-17.
Deposit of funds in banks or depositories — Liability.

No proper authority, including the state treasurer, nor any member of a board or tribunal constituting such a proper authority shall, where acting in good faith, incur any liability by reason of designating any depository, permitting deposits of public funds to be collateralized by the direct method or the pooled method, administering or regulating the pooled method, or taking any other official action required of such proper authority under this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 78, § 6; Code 1933, § 89-815; Ga. L. 1997, p. 868, § 4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 4/SB 296.

45-8-18.
Investment of surplus funds in war bonds or other obligations by treasurer of governmental entity.

The treasurer of any municipality or county or board of trustees of any independent school district may invest any surplus funds in his hands, or any special funds held or being accumulated for any special purpose, or any funds on hand not required for the operation of the municipality, county, or school district for the current fiscal year. He may invest such funds in war bonds or other valid obligations of the United States government, repayable at face value or better, when such investment is authorized by the mayor and general council, county commission, judge of the probate court, board of trustees, or other authority in charge of the affairs of said municipality, county, or independent school district, provided funds accumulated for any special purpose shall be invested only in securities whose maturity date is prior to the date when such funds shall be needed for said special purposes or which are redeemable prior thereto without penalty or loss of principal.

Any bonds or other securities purchased or held pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be held subject to the same conditions as those attached to the funds from which same were purchased.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 453, §§ 1, 2.

Law reviews.

For note discussing and comparing the prudent man rule and the legal list rule in trustee investment, see 15 Mercer L. Rev. 530 (1964).